Utah statutes.
32A-1-301 (Repealed 07/01/11).   Unlawful transfer or use of proof of age -- False information.

(1) (a)  It is unlawful for a person to transfer that person's proof of age to another person to aid that person:

(i)  in procuring an alcoholic beverage or product;

(ii)  to gain admittance to a place where an alcoholic beverage or product is sold or consumed; or

(iii)  to obtain employment that under this title may not be obtained by a minor.

(b)  A person who permits that person's proof of age to be used by another for a purpose stated in Subsection (1)(a) is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

(2) (a)  It is unlawful for a person to use a proof of age containing false information with the intent to:

(i)  procure an alcoholic beverage or product;

(ii)  gain admittance to a place where an alcoholic beverage or product is sold or consumed; or

(iii)  obtain employment that under this title may not be obtained by a minor.

(b)  Except as provided in Section 32A-12-223, a person who violates this Subsection (2) is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

